New Jersey, session 222, S4350.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   As used in this act: Board means a professional or occupational board designated in section 2 of P.L.1978, c.73 (C.45:1-15) that issues a professional or occupational license, certificate of registration, or certification. Veteran means a person who received an honorable discharge at any time from a branch of the active or reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard of any state. 2.   Notwithstanding the provision of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a board shall not charge a fee for the initial application and issuance of a professional or occupational license, certificate of registration, or certificate to an applicant who is a veteran or the spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner of a veteran if that applicant resides in this State and holds a current license to practice the profession or occupation in another jurisdiction that the board determines has licensure requirements to practice the profession or occupation that are equivalent, or substantially equivalent, as the case may be, to those adopted by the board. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month following enactment.